Utah statutes.
76-7-325.   Notice to parent or guardian of minor requesting contraceptive
-- Definition of contraceptives -- Penalty for violation.
(1)  Any person before providing contraceptives to a minor shall notify,
whenever possible, the minor's parents or guardian of the service requested to
be provided to such minor.  Contraceptives shall be defined as appliances
(including but not limited to intrauterine devices), drugs, or medicinal
preparations intended or having special utility for prevention of conception.
(2)  Any person in violation of this section shall be guilty of a class C
misdemeanor.
